Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1711
Parking authority; concessions; competitive bidding.

The authority shall lease or grant concessions for the use of the facilities or various portions thereof to one or more operators to provide for the efficient operation of the facilities. All leases or concessions shall be let on a competitive basis and no lease or concession shall run for a period in excess of thirty years. In granting any lease or concession, the authority shall retain such control of the facilities as may be necessary to insure that the facilities will be properly operated in the public interest and that the prices charged are reasonable.

Laws 1955, c. 22, § 11, p. 107.

Adequate controls are provided to insure that parking facilities are operated in the public interest. Omaha Parking Authority v. City of Omaha, 163 Neb. 97, 77 N.W.2d 862 (1956).